Georgia, session 2025_26, HB340.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Distraction-Free Education Act."
SECTION 2.
Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to elementary and
secondary education, is amended in Part 15 of Article 6, relating to miscellaneous provisions
under the "Quality Basic Education Act," by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
H. B. 340 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 49 2284S
"20-2-324.8.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Access' means viewing, holding, wearing, or otherwise using a device for the
purpose of communication, internet access, gaming, recording, listening to music, or any
other function commonly associated with personal electronic devices.
(2) 'Bell-to-bell' means the period beginning with the first bell signaling the start of
instructional time and ending with the final bell signaling the conclusion of the school
day and shall include all scheduled instructional time, breaks, transitions, assemblies, and
other school related activities occurring between the start and end of the school day.
(3) 'Distraction-free education' means a learning environment where access to personal
electronic devices is restricted to minimize distractions, improve academic outcomes, and
increase meaningful interactions and focused learning experiences.
(4) 'Personal electronic device' means any portable electronic device capable of
transmitting, receiving, or accessing communications, data, or media. Such term
includes, but is not limited to, smartphones, smartwatches, tablets, e-readers, headphones,
and other devices with functionalities such as wireless communication, internet access,
messaging, video recording, gaming, social media access, or data transmission.
(5) 'School day' means the bell-to-bell period for students receiving instruction on a
school campus. Such term shall not apply to students receiving virtual or remote
instruction away from a school campus.
(6) 'School equipment' means any computer or computer networking equipment,
technology or technology related device or service, or communication system or service
that is operated, owned, leased, and made available to students by a local board of
education, local school system, or public school and that is used for transmitting,
receiving, or accessing communications, data, or media.
H. B. 340 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 49 2284S
(b) Beginning no later than July 1, 2026, no public school student in kindergarten through
grade eight shall be permitted to access personal electronic devices during the school day,
except as otherwise provided in this Code section or required by law.
(c) By January 1, 2026, each local school system and public school shall adopt policies
and procedures that, at a minimum:
(1) Prohibit bell-to-bell access to personal electronic devices by students in kindergarten
through grade eight, subject to exceptions provided for by law;
(2) Establish appropriate methods for storing students' personal electronic devices,
including, but not limited to, a student's locker, a locked pouch, or a designated place in
the classroom;
(3) Establish clear procedures for off-site events or activities, including all school
sponsored events and field trips, daily transportation, athletic and extracurricular events,
and other instructional opportunities that do not occur on school grounds;
(4) Establish clear communication protocols that:
(A) Facilitate all emergency communication through school emergency communication
management systems and coordinated by school personnel;
(B) Require parents or guardians who need to communicate with their student during
the school day to contact the school directly; and
(C) Communicate rules for school personnel and sponsors of all school sponsored
events and field trips, daily transportation, athletic and extracurricular events, and other
instructional opportunities that do not occur on school grounds; and
(5) Provide that any student found in violation of such policies and procedures during
the school day shall be subject to progressive consequences in accordance with the local
school system's or public school's student code of conduct, including, but not limited to,
verbal warnings, confiscation of personal electronic devices, parental notification, and
other actions as deemed appropriate.
H. B. 340 (SUB)
- 3 -

LC 49 2284S
(d) A student whose Individualized Education Program (IEP), Section 504 Plan, or
medical plan explicitly mandates the use of a personal electronic device for medical or
educational purposes shall be permitted to access the device as necessary to fulfill the
requirements of the respective program or plan.
(e)(1) Each local school system and public school shall:
(A) Implement appropriate monitoring and enforcement mechanisms to ensure
compliance with policies and procedures established pursuant to this Code section,
which may include, but need not be limited to, assigning designated school personnel
to oversee implementation and adherence to such policies and procedures, conducting
periodic audits of personal electronic device storage, and regularly reviewing
enforcement practices;
(B) Ensure that parents, guardians, and students are informed of such policies and
procedures through student and family handbooks, student codes of conduct, school
public websites, and other common communication channels; and
(C) Regularly review the effectiveness of such policies and procedures and adjust as
necessary to ensure its continued alignment with educational goals and student
well-being.
(2) Each local school system and public school is encouraged to host student and parent
engagement activities designed to promote distraction-free education through personal
electronic device-free, independent play and learning, including, but not limited to,
family workshops, question and answer sessions, town halls, mindfulness or enrichment
sessions, screen-free challenges, and participation in initiatives that encourage students
to engage in meaningful, personal electronic device-free play and activities.
(f) The Department of Education shall provide local school systems and public schools
with guidance and technical support for the effective implementation and enforcement of
the provisions of this Code section.
H. B. 340 (SUB)
- 4 -

LC 49 2284S
(g) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed or applied to prohibit or limit a local
school system or public school from providing school equipment, including, but not limited
to, laptops and tablets, for student use for educational purposes.
(h) This Code section shall not be subject to waiver pursuant to Code Section 20-2-82 for
a strategic waivers school system, Code Section 20-2-2063.2 or 20-2-2065 for a charter
system, Code Section 20-2-2065 for a charter school, Code Section 20-2-2096.3 for a
completion special school, or Code Section 20-2-244."
100 SECTION 3.
101 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 340 (SUB)
- 5 -